zh-TW: 文字顏色: 黑色; 藍色; 棕色; 金色; 灰色; 綠色; 多色; 橙色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅色; 銀色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
th: สีตัวอักษร: สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; สีน้ำตาล; สีทอง; สีเทา; สีเขียว; หลากสี; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีเงิน; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
el: χρώμα κειμένου: Μαύρο; Μπλε; Καφέ; Χρυσό; Γκρι; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Ασημί; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
fi: Tekstin väri: Musta; Sininen; Ruskea; Kullanvärinen; Harmaa; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Hopea; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
sk-SK: Farba textu: Čierna; Modrá; Hnedá; Zlatá; Sivá; Zelená; Viacfarebná; Oranžová; Ružová; Fialová; Červená; Strieborná; Biela; Žltá; Iné
es: Color del texto: Negro; Azul; Marrón; Oro; Gris; Verde; Multicolor; Naranja; Rosa; Morado; Rojo; Plata; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
en: Text color: Black; Blue; Brown; Gold; Gray; Green; Multicolor; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; Silver; White; Yellow; Other
ro-RO: Culoarea textului: Black; Blue; Maro; Auriu; Gri; Verde; Multicolor; Portocaliu; Roz; Mov; Roșu; Argintiu; Alb; Galben; Altele
tr: metin rengi: Siyah; Mavi; Kahverengi; Altın; Gri; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kırmızı; Gümüş; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
it: Colore del testo: Nero; Blu; Marrone; Oro; Grigio; Verde; Multicolore; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Argento; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
ko: 텍스트 색상: 검정색; 파란색; 갈색; 금색; 회색; 녹색; 다색; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 빨간색; 은색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
ja: テキスト色: 黒; 青; 茶色; 金色; 灰色; 緑; マルチカラー; オレンジ; ピンク; 紫; 赤; 銀色; 白; 黄色; その他
pt-PT: Cor do texto: Preto; Azul; Castanho; Dourado; Cinzento; Verde; Multicor; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Prata; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
da: Tekstfarve: Sort; Blå; Brun; Guld; Grå; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Hvid; Gul; Andet
nb: Tekstfarge: Svart; Blå; Brun; Gull; Grå; Grønn; Flerfarget; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Hvit; Gul; Annet
vi: Màu chữ: Màu đen; Màu xanh dương; Màu nâu; Màu vàng; Màu xám; Màu xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; Màu cam; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu bạc; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
lt-LT: Teksto spalva: Juoda; Mėlyna; Ruda; Auksinė; Pilka; Žalia; Įvairiaspalvė; Oranžinė; Rožinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Sidabrinė; Balta; Geltona; Kita
bg-BG: Цвят на текста: Черен; Син; Кафяв; Златен; Сив; Зелен; Многоцветен; Оранжев; Розов; Лилав; Червен; Сребърен; Бял; Жълт; Друго
hr-HR: Boja teksta: Crna; Plava; Smeđa; Zlatna; Siva; Zelena; Višebojna; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Srebrna; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
hu: Szövegszín: Fekete; Kék; Barna; Arany; Szürke; Zöld; Többszínű; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Lila; Piros; Ezüst; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
ru: Цвет текста: Черный; Синий; Коричневый; Золотой; Серый; Зеленый; Разноцветный; Оранжевый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Серебристый; Белый; Желтый; Другое
pl: Kolor tekstu: Czarny; Niebieski; Brązowy; Złoty; Szary; Zielony; Wielokolorowy; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Srebrny; Biały; Żółty; Inne
fr: Couleur du texte: Noir; Bleu; Marron; Or; Gris; Vert; Multicolore; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Argent; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
cs: Barva textu: Černá; Modrá; Hnědá; Zlatá; Šedá; Zelená; Vícebarevná; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Stříbrná; Bílá; Žlutá; Ostatní
sl-SI: Barva besedila: Black; Blue; Rjava; Zlata; Siva; Zelena; Večbarvna; Oranžna; Roza; Vijolična; Rdeča; Srebrna; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
nl: Tekstkleur: Zwart; Blauw; Bruin; Goud; Grijs; Groen; Veelkleurig; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Zilver; Wit; Geel; Overige
sv: Textfärg: Svart; Blå; Brun; Guld; Grå; Grön; Flerfärgad; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Silver; Vit; Gul; Annat
pt-BR: Texto cor: Preto; Azul; Marrom; Dourado; Cinza; Verde; Multicolorido; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Prata; Branco; Amarelo; Outros
zh-CN: 文本颜色: 黑色; 蓝色; 棕色; 金色; 灰色; 绿色; 多色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 银色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
de: Textfarbe: Schwarz; Blau; Braun; Gold; Grau; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Silber; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige